Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3360.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Pursuant to the request of the Warwick City Council by resolution adopted
on May 11, 2026, Article VIII of the Warwick City Charter is hereby amended to read as follows:
8-23. – Council Advice and Consent to Boards and Commissions.
Notwithstanding any provisions of this charter to the contrary, and except for the Board of
Public Safety, the city council may enact ordinances that subject mayoral appointments to city
boards and commissions specifically codified in the charter or the code of ordinances to the advice
and consent of the city council.
SECTION 2. Pursuant to Article 10, Section 29 of the Warwick City Charter, these
amendments shall be submitted to the voters of the city at the next general election to be held in
November, 2026, or a special election as may be scheduled sooner, for approval or rejection thereof,
in the following form:
1. Shall the city council be authorized to enact ordinances that subject mayoral
appointments to city boards and commissions specifically codified in the charter or the code of
ordinances, except for the Board of Public Safety, to the advice and consent of the city council?
APPROVE DISAPPROVE
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this act shall take effect upon passage. Section 1 of this act shall

take effect upon approval by the voters of the city of Warwick at a general or special election.
========
LC006563
========
LC006563 - Page 2 of 3